District of Columbia statutes.
10-806

Secretary of the Interior to sell certain real estate — Expenses of sales.

Said Secretary is further authorized to pay the reasonable and necessary expenses of sale of each parcel of land sold, and shall deposit the net proceeds thereof in the Treasury to the credit of the United States and the District of Columbia in the proportion that each paid the appropriations from which the parcels of land were acquired or were obligated to pay the same, at the time of acquisition, by reimbursement.

History

Aug. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 1211, ch. 449, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-406.
1973 Ed., § 9-306.